Vermont, session 2025-2026, H339.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 2021 Acts and Resolves No. 70, Sec. 7, as amended by 2023 Acts and
Resolves No. 67, Sec. 8, is further amended to read:
Sec. 7. REPEAL
7 V.S.A. § 230 is repealed on July 1, 2025. [Repealed.]
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: May 27, 2025
VT LEG #384091 v.1